Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 20

Law Enforcement Agencies for Private Colleges and Universities

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-20-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Control” means that a private college or university is maintained on the property or rents or leases the property to facilitate events or functions of the private college or university;

“Executive head” means the president or governing board of a private college or university;

“Private college or university” means a college, university, or teaching hospital that has all of the following characteristics:

Is not owned or controlled by the state or a political subdivision of the state;

Provides a program of education in residence leading to a baccalaureate degree or provides a program of education in residence for which the baccalaureate degree is a prerequisite, leading to an academic or professional degree;

Is accredited by the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools or another nationally recognized agency that accredits private colleges and universities; and

Has its principal place of business located in the state; and

“Property” means both real property and personal property owned by or under the control of the private college or university and includes without limitation all highways, streets, alleys, and rights-of-way that are contiguous or adjacent to real property owned by or under the control of the private college or university.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

12-20-102. Applicability — Cumulative effect.

This chapter applies to the property of each private college or university.

This chapter does not mean that a private college or university is an agent of the State of Arkansas.

This chapter is cumulative to any remedies that each private college or university may possess for enforcing its rules and regulations, including its rights to impose sanctions through fees and charges and its rights to discipline, deny service, and expel.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

12-20-103. Enforcement.

The prosecuting attorney or the city attorney, as may be appropriate, shall appear and prosecute in court all criminal offenses arising under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

Subchapter 2

— Law Enforcement Officers

12-20-201. Appointment and removal of private college or university law enforcement officers.

An executive head of a private college or university may appoint one (1) or more of the employees of the private college or university as a private college or university law enforcement officer for the private college or university, who shall exercise law enforcement officer authority under the laws of this state.

A private college or university law enforcement officer shall:

Have all the powers, duties, and obligations provided under the law for municipal police departments and county sheriffs, to be exercised as required for the protection of the private college or university, together with any other duties that may be assigned by the employing private college or university; and

Meet the requirements for certification set out by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training in addition to any private college or university requirements.

The jurisdictional powers or responsibilities of a county sheriff or municipal police department over the property of a private college or university or a person on the property of a private college or university are not ceded to a private college or university law enforcement officer.

The appointment or designation of private college or university law enforcement officers does not supersede the authority of the Department of Arkansas State Police, a county sheriff, or a municipal police department of the jurisdiction within which the property of the private college or university, or portions of it, is located.

A private college or university law enforcement officer shall be identified by a shield or badge bearing the name of the private college or university.

The private college or university shall issue an identification card bearing the photograph of the private college or university law enforcement officer who shall carry it on his or her person at all times when on duty and display it upon request.

A private college or university law enforcement officer's authorization to have and to exercise the powers provided by law for law enforcement officers shall be further evidenced by a letter of appointment issued under the seal of the private college or university.

The executive head of the private college or university shall maintain a file containing each private college or university law enforcement officer's letter of appointment and all other certificates and information consistent with the rules of the commission.

The executive head of the private college or university or the department may revoke in writing the appointment to serve as a private college or university law enforcement officer for the private college or university.

Upon revocation as described in subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section, the person shall not possess or exercise the authority of a private college or university law enforcement officer.

A copy of all revocations shall be placed into the file described in subdivision (e)(2) of this section.

A private college or university employing a private college or university law enforcement officer shall notify the commission of any change in the private college or university law enforcement officer's status within three (3) days.

A private college or university law enforcement officer shall not be reimbursed with state funds for any training he or she receives or be eligible to participate in any state or municipal retirement system.

Protect property;

Preserve and maintain proper order and decorum;

Prevent unlawful assemblies, disorderly conduct, and trespass;

Exclude and eject persons detrimental to the well-being of the private college or university; and

Regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles upon property of the private college or university.

As used in subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section, “official business” includes without limitation:

Engaging in intelligence-gathering activity relating to security on the property of the private college or university employing him or her;

Investigating a crime committed on the property of the private college or university employing him or her;

Transporting money, valuables, securities, or other valuables on behalf of the private college or university employing him or her;

Providing security or protective services for officials or visiting dignitaries to the private college or university employing him or her; or

Continuously and immediately pursuing a person for an offense committed on the property of the private college or university employing him or her or in the private college or university law enforcement officer's eyesight.

(1)When a private college or university law enforcement officer makes an arrest outside his or her primary jurisdiction, the private college or university law enforcement officer shall promptly notify the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction and forward a written report to the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction no later than the next working day.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

12-20-202. Private college or university law enforcement officer's duties and powers — Definition.

A private college or university law enforcement officer's primary jurisdiction is the private college or university employing him or her, and except to the extent otherwise limited by the executive head of the private college or university appointing him or her, the private college or university law enforcement officer shall:

(1)A private college or university law enforcement officer shall exercise police supervision on behalf of the private college or university and may arrest any person in the private college or university law enforcement officer's primary jurisdiction who is committing an offense against any law of the State of Arkansas or against the ordinances of the city or county in which the private college or university is located.

A private college or university law enforcement officer may summon a posse comitatus if necessary to complete an arrest under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

A private college or university law enforcement officer may make an arrest for an offense against any law of the State of Arkansas outside his or her primary jurisdiction if the private college or university law enforcement officer is:

Summoned by another law enforcement agency to provide assistance;

Assisting another law enforcement agency;

Exercising his or her police powers in accordance with a written mutual aid agreement or memorandum of understanding between the private college or university and the municipality or county within which the private college or university is located; or

(A)Traveling to or from any location in the state on official business.

The law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may choose to conduct the investigation or allow the private college or university law enforcement officer to conduct the investigation.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

12-20-203. Records kept by a private college or university law enforcement agency.

Records generated or kept by a private college or university law enforcement agency under this chapter are subject to the same record keeping and disclosure requirements of a state or local law enforcement agency.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

Subchapter 3

— Motor Vehicle Regulation

12-20-301. Rules and regulations for motor vehicles on private college or university grounds.

Each private college or university may promulgate and amend rules and regulations for the operation and parking of motor vehicles on its property as its governing board deems necessary if the rules and regulations do not conflict with governing state law or a city or county ordinance.

The rules and regulations described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be submitted to the city or county where the property of the private college or university is located for adoption as ordinances, including without limitation ordinances that:

Limit the rate of speed; and

Enforce other traffic rules, including control and direction of traffic.

Speed limits shall be posted at reasonable intervals, and traffic and parking directions and prohibitions shall be indicated by signs.

[Reserved.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 626, § 1, subsection (a) began:

“In order to ensure public notice and safety, from and after August 1, 1997,”.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment rewrote (a).

Cross References. Community-based residential programs and regulations, §25-10-134.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 9, provided: “Temporary legislation.

“(a)(1)The criminal detention facility review committees established under §12-26-101 et seq. before the effective date of this act are abolished on January 1, 2019.

“(2)A vacancy on a committee abolished by this act shall not be filled before January 1, 2019, absent an appointment by the Governor in the event of an emergency.

“(b)At the initial meeting of a criminal detention facility review committee created under this act, the members of the committee shall draw lots for staggered initial terms as follows:

“(1)One (1) member to serve an initial one-year term;

“(2)One (1) member to serve an initial two-year term;

“(3)One (1) member to serve an initial three-year term; and

“(4)Two (2) members to serve initial four-year terms.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 741, § 13: Mar. 23, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a need exists to continue the adoption and enforcement of minimum standards for criminal detention facilities within this state, and that immediate action is necessary to achieve and facilitate an orderly transfer of the powers, functions, and duties of the Criminal Detention Facilities Board to the several Criminal Detention Facilities Review Committees created by this act. Therefore, an emergency is deemed to exist, and in order to protect the public peace, health, and safety, this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 515, § 8: Mar. 13, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is immediately necessary to provide for an adequate system of monitoring jails, juvenile detention facilities, and criminal detention facilities to prohibit juveniles from being treated as criminals, to place such juveniles under proper care, to assure adequate standards for juvenile detention facilities, and to prohibit juveniles from associating with hardened adult criminals; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary for the protection of juveniles. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation and protection of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “and juvenile detention facilities” in (a) and (b); and, in (b), substituted “facility” for “facilities” preceding “review committee within” and substituted “criminal detention facility review committee districts” for “judicial districts”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 3.

Chapters 21-24

[Reserved.]